Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-509.01
Cash balance; expenditure authorized;
limitation.

On and after the first day of its fiscal year
in 1993 and of each succeeding year or
on or after the first day of its biennial period and until the
adoption of the budget by a governing body in September, the governing body
may expend any balance of cash on hand for the current expenses of the political
subdivision governed by the governing body. Except as provided in section
13-509.02, such expenditures shall not exceed an amount equivalent to the
total amount expended under the last budget in the equivalent period of the
prior budget year or biennial
period. Such expenditures shall be charged against the appropriations
for each individual fund or purpose as provided in the budget when adopted.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 21;

Laws 1994, LB 1257, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB111, § 6.